Washington statutes.
RCW 16.49.025

Rules.

The director shall enforce and carry out the provisions of this chapter and adopt rules necessary to carry out its purpose. The rules may include, but are not limited to:

(1) Requirements for construction, equipment, cleaning, sanitation, and sanitary practices to ensure sanitary operations;

(2) Requirements for identification or tagging of meat food animals slaughtered by licensees to maintain identification of the owner of the animal;

(3) Requirements for handling and storing inspected and uninspected meats and meat products;

(4) Requirements for labeling meat and meat products; and

(5) Requirements for slaughtering and processing of meat food birds by licensees.

[ 2000 c 99 s 3; 1987 c 77 s 5. Formerly RCW 16.49.680.]

NOTES:

Savings—1987 c 77: See note following RCW 16.49.015.